California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(3) In the case of a sale, the distributor or seller shall make a telephone call after 5 p.m. to the purchaser confirming the order prior to shipping the tobacco products. The telephone call may be a person-to-person call or a recorded message. The distributor or seller is not required to speak directly with a person and may leave a message on an answering machine or by voice mail.

(4) (A) The nonsale distributor shall deliver the tobacco product to the recipient’s verified mailing address, or, in the case of a sale, the seller or distributor shall deliver the tobacco product to the purchaser’s verified billing address on the check or credit card used for payment.

(B) In the case of a nonsale,
 a recipient may designate an alternative address for delivery, if the recipient’s mailing address has been verified in accordance with this section.

(C) In the case of a sale, a purchaser may designate an
 alternative address for delivery, if the purchaser’s billing address has been verified in accordance with this section.

(D) A delivery described under this section shall not be permitted to any post office box.

(5) The tobacco product shall be delivered only in a container that is conspicuously labeled with the words: “CONTAINS TOBACCO PRODUCTS: SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY.”

(6) Upon the delivery of the tobacco product to the recipient’s or purchaser’s address, the seller, distributor, or nonsale distributor shall obtain the signature of a person 21 years of age or older before completing the delivery.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if a seller, distributor, or nonsale distributor, complies with all of the requirements of this section and a person under 21 years of age obtains a tobacco product by any of the means described in subdivision (b), the seller, distributor, or nonsale distributor is not in violation of this section.

(d) For the purposes of the enforcement of this section pursuant to Section 22958, the acts of the United States Postal Service or other common carrier when engaged in the business of transporting and delivering packages for others, and the acts of a person, whether compensated or not, who transports or delivers a package for another person without any reason to know of the package’s contents, are not unlawful and are not subject to civil penalties.

(e) (1) (A) For the purposes of this section, a “distributor” is any person or entity, within or outside the state, who agrees to distribute tobacco products to a customer or recipient within the state. The United States Postal Service or any other public or private postal or package delivery service is not a distributor within the meaning of this section.

(B) A “nonsale distributor” is any person inside or outside of this state who, directly or indirectly, knowingly provides tobacco products to any person in this state as part of a nonsale transaction. “Nonsale distributor” includes the person or entity who provides the tobacco product for delivery and the person or entity who delivers the product to the recipient as part of a nonsale transaction.

(C) “Nonsale distribution” means to give smokeless tobacco or cigarettes to the general public at no cost, or at nominal cost, or to give coupons, coupon offers, gift certificates, gift cards, or other similar offers, or rebate offers for smokeless tobacco or cigarettes to the general public at no cost or at nominal cost. Distribution of tobacco products, coupons, coupon offers, gift certificates, gift cards, or other similar offers, or rebate offers in connection with the sale of another item, including tobacco products, cigarette lighters, magazines, or newspapers shall not constitute nonsale distribution.

(2) For the purpose of this section, a “seller” is any person or entity, within or outside the state, who agrees to sell tobacco products to a customer within the state. The United States Postal Service or any other public or
 private postal or package delivery service is not a seller within the meaning of this section.

(3) For the purpose of this section, a “carton” is a package or container that contains 200 cigarettes.

(f) A district attorney, city attorney, or the Attorney General may assess civil penalties against any person, firm, corporation, or other entity that violates this section, according to the following schedule:

(1) A civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) for the first violation.

(2) A civil penalty of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and not more than three thousand
 five hundred dollars ($3,500) for the second violation.

(3) A civil penalty of not less than four thousand dollars ($4,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the third violation within a five-year period.

(4) A civil penalty of not less than five thousand five hundred dollars ($5,500) and not more than six thousand five hundred dollars ($6,500) for the fourth violation within a five-year period.

(5) A civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a fifth or subsequent violation within a five-year period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 11.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22964.

This division sets forth minimum state restrictions with respect to the legal age to purchase or possess tobacco products and does not preempt or otherwise prohibit the adoption of a local standard that imposes a more restrictive legal age to purchase or possess tobacco products. A local standard that imposes a more restrictive legal age to purchase or possess tobacco products shall control in the event of any inconsistency between this division and a local standard.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 7.   (SB 7 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8.6. CIGARETTE AND TOBACCO PRODUCTS LICENSING ACT OF 2003 [22970. - 22991.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [22970. - 22971.5.]

22970.

This division shall be known as and may be cited as the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Licensing Act of 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22970.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The State of California has enacted excise taxes on the distribution of cigarettes and tobacco products to provide funding for local and state programs, including health services, antismoking campaigns, cancer research, and education programs.

(b) Tax revenues have declined by hundreds of millions of dollars per year due, in part, to unlawful distributions and untaxed sales of cigarettes and tobacco products conducted by organized crime syndicates, street gangs, and international terrorist groups.

(c) The enforcement of California’s cigarette and tobacco products tax laws is necessary to collect millions of dollars in lost tax revenues each year.

(d) The licensing of manufacturers, importers, wholesalers, distributors, and retailers will help stem the tide of untaxed distributions and illegal sales of cigarettes and tobacco products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22970.2.

The board shall administer a statewide program to license manufacturers, importers, distributors, wholesalers, and retailers of cigarettes and tobacco products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22970.3.

The board may create a Tobacco Tax Compliance Task Force for the purpose of advising the board on cigarette and tobacco products tax compliance issues that may include, but not be limited to, representatives from the following:

(a) The board.

(b) The office of the Attorney General.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board.

(d) The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

(e) The State Department of Health Services.

(f) Federal agencies necessary to coordinate programs to combat tobacco tax evasion, smuggling, and counterfeiting.

(g) One person from each of the categories of persons required by this division to have a license.

(h) Other states engaged in tobacco tax compliance efforts.

(i) Local law enforcement agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22971.

For purposes of this division, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Brand family” has the same meaning as that term is defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 30165.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) “Cigarette” means a cigarette as defined in Section 30003 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) (1) “Control” or “controlling” means possession, direct or indirect, of the power:

(A) To vote 25 percent or more of any class of the voting securities issued by a person.

(B) To direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or as otherwise provided; however, no individual shall be deemed to control a person solely on account of being a director, officer, or employee of that person.

(2) For purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), a person who, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds, with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing 10 percent or more of the then outstanding voting securities issued by another person, is presumed to control that other person.

(3) For purposes of this division, the department may determine whether a person in fact controls another person.

(d) “Department” means
 the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(e) “Display for sale” means the placement of cigarettes or tobacco products in a vending machine or in retail stock for the purpose of selling or gifting the cigarettes or tobacco products. For purposes of this definition, the clear and easily visible display of cigarettes or tobacco products shall create a rebuttable presumption that either were displayed for sale.

(f) “Distributor” means a distributor as defined in Section 30011 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(g) “Flavored tobacco product” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 104559.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) “Gifting” means any transfer of title or possession without consideration, exchange, or barter, in any manner or by any means, of cigarettes or tobacco products that have been purchased for resale under a license issued pursuant to this division if the transfer occurs while the license is suspended or after the effective date of its revocation.

(i) “Importer” means an importer as defined in Section 30019 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(j) “Law enforcement agency” means a sheriff, a police department, or a city, county, or city and county agency or department designated by the governing body of that agency to enforce this chapter or to enforce local smoking and tobacco ordinances and regulations.

(k) “License” means a license issued by the department pursuant to this division.

(l) “Licensee” means a person holding a license issued by the department pursuant to this division.

(m) “Local lead agency” means an agency designated as a local lead agency pursuant to Section 104400 of the Health and Safety Code.

(n) “Manufacturer” means a manufacturer of cigarettes or tobacco products sold in this state.

(o) “Notice” or “notification” means, unless as otherwise provided, the written notice or notification provided to a licensee by the department by either actual delivery to the licensee or by first-class mail addressed to the licensee at the address on the license.

(p) “Package of cigarettes” means a package as defined in Section 30015 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(q) “Person” means a person as defined in Section 30010 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(r) “Retailer” means a person who engages in this state in the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products directly to the public
 from a retail location. Retailer includes a person who operates vending machines from which cigarettes or tobacco products are sold in this state.

(s) “Retail location” means both of the following:

(1) Any building from which cigarettes or tobacco products are sold at retail.

(2) A vending machine.

(t) “Sale” or “sold” means a sale as defined in Section 30006 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(u) “Tobacco product flavor enhancer” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 104559.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(v) “Tobacco products” means tobacco products as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 30121 and subdivision (b) of Section 30131.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(w) “Unstamped package of cigarettes” means a package of cigarettes that does not bear a tax stamp as required under Part 13 (commencing with Section 30001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, including a package of cigarettes that bears a tax stamp of another state or taxing jurisdiction, a package of cigarettes that bears a counterfeit tax stamp, or a stamped or unstamped package of cigarettes that is marked “Not for sale in the United States.”

(x) “Wholesaler” means a wholesaler as defined
 in Section 30016 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 269, Sec. 2.   (AB 573)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22971.1.

Commencing January 1, 2006, the Bureau of State Audits shall conduct a performance audit of the licensing and enforcement provisions of this division, and shall report its findings to the board and the Legislature by July 1, 2006. The report shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) The actual costs of the program.

(b) The level of additional revenue generated by the program compared to the period before its implementation.

(c) Tax compliance rates.

(d) The costs of enforcement at the varying levels.

(e) The appropriateness of penalties assessed in this division.

(f) The overall effectiveness of enforcement programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22971.2.

The board shall administer and enforce the provisions of this division and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22971.3.

Nothing in this division preempts or supersedes any local tobacco control law other than those related to the collection of state taxes. Local licensing laws may provide for the suspension or revocation of the local license for any violation of a state tobacco control law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22971.4.

No person is subject to the requirements of this division if that person is exempt from regulation under the United States Constitution, the laws of the United States, or the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 822, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22971.5.

Any notice required by this division shall be served personally or by mail. If by mail, the notice shall be placed in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the licensee at the address as it appears in the records of the board. The giving of notice shall be deemed complete at the time of deposit of the notice in the United States Post Office, or a mailbox, subpost office, substation, or mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service, without extension of time for any reason. In lieu of mailing, a notice may be served personally by delivering to the person to be served and service shall be deemed complete at the time of delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in
 the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaints in a civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 607, Sec. 2.   (AB 2733)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. License for Retailers of Cigarettes and Tobacco Products [22971.7. - 22974.8.]

22971.7.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, except as provided in subdivision (b), and notwithstanding subdivision (v) of Section 22971, a “tobacco product” includes a product or device as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5.

(b) This section does not apply to subdivision (b) of Section 22974.3.

(c) This section shall be operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 269, Sec. 3.   (AB 573)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22972.

(a) Commencing June 30, 2004, a retailer shall have in place and maintain a license to engage in the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products. A retailer that owns or controls more than one retail location shall obtain a separate license for each retail location, but may submit a single application for those licenses.

(b) The retailer shall conspicuously display the license at each retail location in a manner visible to the public.

(c) A license is not assignable or transferable. A person who obtains a license as a retailer who ceases to do business as specified in the license, or who never commenced business, or whose license is suspended or revoked, shall
 immediately surrender the license to the board.

(d) A license shall be valid for a 12-month period, and shall be renewed annually. A retailer that adds an additional retail location shall renew the license for that location based on a 12-month period beginning in the month the retailer obtained its license for its first retail location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 699, Sec. 1.   (AB 2770)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22972.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 22972 or Section 22973, the board may issue to a retailer a temporary license with a scheduled expiration date, as determined by the board, that occurs on or before September 30, 2004.

(b) A temporary license issued pursuant to this section shall be automatically terminated upon the board’s issuance of a license pursuant to Section 22973.1.

(c) A temporary license issued pursuant to this section is subject to the same suspension, revocation, and forfeiture provisions that apply to licenses issued by the board pursuant to Section 22973.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 82, Sec. 2.   Effective June 30, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22973.

(a) An application for a retailer license, as defined in Section 22972, shall be filed in a form and manner prescribed by the department and shall include the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the applicant.

(2) The business name, address, and telephone number of each retail location. For applicants who control more than one retail location, an address for receipt of correspondence or notices from the department, such as a headquarters or corporate office of the retailer, shall also be included on the application and listed on the license. Citations issued to licensees shall be forwarded to all
 addressees on the license.

(3) A statement by the applicant affirming that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony and has not violated and will not violate or cause or permit to be violated any of the provisions of this division or any rule of the department applicable to the applicant or pertaining to the manufacture, sale, or distribution of cigarettes or tobacco products. If the applicant is unable to affirm this statement, the application shall contain a statement by the applicant of the nature of any violation or the reasons that will prevent the applicant from complying with the requirements with respect to the statement.

(4) If any other licenses or permits have been issued by the department or the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control to the applicant, the
 license or permit number of those licenses or permits then in effect.

(5) A statement by the applicant that the contents of the application are complete, true, and correct. Any person who signs a statement pursuant to this subdivision that asserts the truth of any material matter that they know to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment of up to one year in the county jail, or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both the imprisonment and the fine.

(6) The signature of the applicant.

(7) Any other information the department may require.

(b) The department may investigate to determine the truthfulness and
 completeness of the information provided in the application. The department may issue a retailer license without further investigation to an applicant for a retail location if the applicant holds a valid license from the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control for that same location.

(c) The department shall provide electronic means for applicants to download and submit applications.

(d) (1) Each application for a retailer license filed on or after June 9, 2016, and before July 1, 2026, shall be accompanied with a fee of two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265) per retail location. An applicant that owns or controls more than one retail location shall obtain a separate license for each retail location, but may submit a single application for those licenses
 with an application license fee of two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265) per location. The fee shall be for the period provided in subdivision (d) of Section 22972 and shall not be prorated.

(2) Each application for a retailer license filed on or after July 1, 2026, shall be accompanied with a fee of four hundred fifty dollars ($450) per retail location and shall not be prorated.

(e) Every retailer shall file an application for renewal of the retailer license in the form and manner prescribed by the department and shall be accompanied with the applicable fee, as follows:

(1) Each application for renewal of the retailer license filed on or after January 1, 2017, and before July 1, 2026, shall be accompanied with a
 fee of two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265) per retail location.

(2) Each application for renewal of the retailer license filed on or after July 1, 2026, shall be accompanied with a fee of four hundred fifty dollars ($450) per retail location.

(f) The department may, by regulation, adjust the license application fee amount set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) and the renewal license fee amount set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) to an amount not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600) per retail location to maintain the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund at a level that is no more than necessary to cover the reasonable costs of the department to
 administer this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 269, Sec. 4.   (AB 573)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22973.1.

(a) The board shall issue a license to a retailer upon receipt of a completed application and payment of the fees prescribed in Section 22973, unless any of the following apply:

(1) The retailer, or if the retailer is not an individual, any person controlling the retailer, has previously been issued a license that is suspended or revoked by the board for violation of any of the provisions of this division.

(2) The application is for a license or renewal of a license for a retail location that is the same retail location as that of a retailer whose license was revoked or is subject to revocation proceedings for
 violation of any of the provisions of this division, unless:

(A) It has been more than five years since a previous license for the retail location was revoked.

(B) The person applying for the license provides the board with documentation demonstrating that the applicant has acquired or is acquiring the premises or business in an arm’s length transaction. For purposes of this section, an “arm’s length transaction” is defined as a sale in good faith and for valuable consideration that reflects the fair market value in the open market between two informed and willing parties, neither under any compulsion to participate in the transaction. A sale between relatives, related companies or partners, or a sale for the primary purpose of avoiding the effect of the violations of this division that occurred at the retail location, is presumed not to be made at “arm’s length.”

(3) The retailer, or if the retailer is not an individual, any person controlling the retailer, has been convicted of a felony pursuant to Section 30473 or 30480 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(4) The retailer does not possess all required permits or licenses required under the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) (1) Any retailer who is denied a license may petition for a redetermination of the board’s denial of the license within 30 days after service upon that retailer of the notice of the denial of the license. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30-day period, the determination of denial becomes final at the expiration of the 30-day period.

(2) Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall
 state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at anytime prior to the date on which the board issues its order or decision upon the petition for redetermination.

(3) If the petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the board shall reconsider the determination of the denial and, if the retailer has so requested in the petition, shall grant the retailer an oral hearing and shall give the retailer at least 10 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing. The board may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(4) The order or decision of the board upon a petition for redetermination becomes final 30 days after mailing of notice thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 607, Sec. 3.   (AB 2733)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22973.2.

The department shall, upon request, provide to the State Department of Public Health, the office of the Attorney General, a law enforcement agency, a local lead agency, and any agency authorized to enforce or administer state or local tobacco control laws, access to the department’s database of licenses issued to retailers within the jurisdiction of that agency, local lead agency, or law enforcement agency. The agencies authorized by this section to access the department’s database shall access and use the department’s database only for purposes of enforcing tobacco control laws and shall adhere to all state laws, policies, and regulations pertaining to the protection of personal information and individual
 privacy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 2.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22973.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, an application for a retailer license, as defined in Section 22972, for the sale of a tobacco product, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5, that is not subject to a tax imposed by the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Tax Law pursuant to Part 13 (commencing with Section 30001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be filed in a form and manner prescribed by the department and shall include the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the applicant.

(2) The business name, address, and telephone number of each retail location. For
 applicants who control more than one retail location, an address for receipt of correspondence or notices from the department, such as a headquarters or corporate office of the retailer, shall also be included on the application and listed on the license. Citations issued to licensees shall be forwarded to all addressees on the license.

(3) A statement by the applicant affirming that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony and has not violated and will not violate or cause or permit to be violated any of the provisions of this division or any rule of the department applicable to the applicant or pertaining to the manufacture, sale, or distribution of cigarettes or tobacco products. If the applicant is unable to affirm this statement, the application shall contain a statement by the applicant of the nature of any violation or the
 reasons that will
 prevent the applicant from complying with the requirements with respect to the statement.

(4) If any other licenses or permits have been issued by the department or the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control to the applicant, the license or permit number of those licenses or permits then in effect.

(5) A statement by the applicant that the contents of the application are complete, true, and correct. Any person who signs a statement pursuant to this subdivision that asserts the truth of any material matter that they know to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment of up to one year in a county jail, or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both the imprisonment and the fine.

(6) The signature of the applicant.

(7) Any other information the department may require.

(b) The department may investigate to determine the truthfulness and completeness of the information provided in the application. The department may issue a retailer license without further investigation to an applicant for a retail location if the applicant holds a valid license from the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control for that same location.

(c) The department shall provide electronic means for applicants to download and submit applications.

(d) (1) Each application for a retailer license filed on or after January 1, 2017,
 and before July 1, 2026, shall be accompanied with a fee of two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265) per retail location. An applicant that owns or controls more than one retail location shall obtain a separate license and shall pay a separate fee for each retail location, but may submit a single application for those retailer licenses with an application license fee of two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265) per retail location. The fee per retail location shall be for the period provided in subdivision (d) of Section 22972 and shall not be prorated.

(2) Each application for a retailer license filed on or after July 1, 2026, shall be accompanied with a fee of four hundred fifty dollars ($450) per retail location and shall not be prorated.

(e) (1) Every retailer
 shall file an application for renewal of the retailer license in the form and manner prescribed by the department and shall be accompanied with the applicable fee, as follows:

(2) Each application for renewal of the retailer license filed on or after January 1, 2017, and before July 1, 2026, shall be accompanied with a fee of two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265) per retail location.

(3) Each application for renewal of the retailer license filed on or after July 1, 2026, shall be accompanied with a fee of four hundred fifty dollars ($450) per retail location.

(f) The department may, by regulation, adjust the application license fee amount set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) and the renewal license fee
 amount set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) to an amount not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600) per retail location to maintain the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund at a level that is no more than necessary to cover the reasonable costs of the department to administer this division. 

(g) (1) The department shall report back to the Legislature no later than January 1, 2019, regarding the adequacy of funding for the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Licensing Act of 2003 with regard to tobacco products for which a license is required by this section. The report shall include data and recommendations about whether the annual licensing fee funding levels are set at an appropriate level to maintain an effective enforcement program.

(2) The
 report required by paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) (1) This section applies to a retailer who sells a tobacco product, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5, that is not subject to a tax imposed by the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Tax Law pursuant to Part 13 (commencing with Section 30001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and who does not already possess a valid retailer license to sell cigarettes or tobacco products issued pursuant to Section 22972.

(2) A retailer that possesses a valid retailer license to sell cigarettes and tobacco products issued pursuant to Section 22972 may also sell under that license a tobacco product, as defined in
 subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5, that is not subject to a tax imposed by the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Tax Law pursuant to Part 13 (commencing with Section 30001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 269, Sec. 5.   (AB 573)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22973.4.

(a) On or before December 1, 2027, and again on or before December 1, 2029, the Legislative Analyst shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature on the tobacco retailer enforcement landscape, including enforcement of California’s flavor, youth access, taxation, and licensing laws. The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration and the State Department of Public Health, including the Office of Youth Tobacco Enforcement, shall cooperate with the Legislative Analyst in the preparation and production of the report. To the extent information is available, the report shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Strategies and tools to bolster coordination and efficiency between state and federal
 agencies and local authorities regarding enforcement of all tobacco laws and to ensure state compliance with the federal Synar regulations requiring no more than a 20 percent retailer violation rate for tobacco sales to youth and young adults under 21 years of age.

(2) Data and recommendations about whether the annual licensing fees are set at appropriate levels to maintain an effective licensing program and an adequate rate of inspection of retailers and attain a reasonable reduction in the availability of flavored tobacco products and tobacco product flavor enhancers.

(3) Costs for
 transport, storage, and disposal of hazardous waste, universal waste, and other waste arising from seizures of tobacco products.

(4) An evaluation of whether prior violations of analogous federal and local laws regarding the sale of tobacco products to minors should be considered when considering escalating penalties for violations of state laws regarding the sale of tobacco products to minors.

(5) Data and recommendations about the enforcement of youth access and flavor restriction laws performed by the Office of Youth Tobacco Enforcement, including whether funding is at appropriate levels to maintain an adequate rate of inspection of retailers and to attain a reasonable reduction in the availability of flavored tobacco products.

(b) To prepare the reports required by this section, the Legislative Analyst may request information from any state or local agency involved in enforcement of laws regulating cigarette and tobacco products retailers.

(c) The reports required by this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code and shall not include any personally identifiable information.

(d) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section shall become inoperative on December 1, 2033, and is repealed on January 1, 2034.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 269, Sec. 6.   (AB 573)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative December 1, 2033, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22974.

A retailer shall retain purchase invoices that meet the requirements set forth in Section 22978.4 for all cigarettes or tobacco products the retailer purchased for a period of four years. The records shall be kept at the retail location for at least one year after the purchase. Invoices shall be made available upon request during normal business hours for review inspection and copying by the board or by a law enforcement agency. Any retailer found in violation of these requirements or any person who fails, refuses, or neglects to retain or make available invoices for inspection and copying in accordance with this section shall be subject to penalties pursuant to Section 22981.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22974.2.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, upon discovery by the department or a law enforcement agency that a retailer possesses, stores, owns, or has made a retail sale of flavored tobacco products or tobacco product flavor enhancers in violation of Section 104559.5 of the Health and Safety Code, the department or the law enforcement agency may seize the flavored tobacco products or tobacco product flavor enhancers at the retail location or any other person’s location.

(2) Any flavored tobacco products or tobacco product flavor enhancers seized by a law enforcement agency shall be delivered to the department, or its designee, within 30 days, unless the seized flavored tobacco products or tobacco
 product flavor enhancers shall be destroyed by that law enforcement agency, or unless the seized flavored tobacco products or tobacco product flavor enhancers are otherwise required to be used as evidence in an administrative, criminal, or civil proceeding, or as part of an ongoing law enforcement operation. Any flavored tobacco products or tobacco product flavor enhancers seized by the department or delivered to the department by a law enforcement agency shall be deemed forfeited to the state and the department shall comply with procedures set forth in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 30435) of Part 13 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) (1) In addition to seizure and forfeiture of the flavored tobacco products or tobacco product flavor enhancers under subdivision (a), the department shall issue a civil penalty against the retailer equal to fifty dollars ($50) per individual package of flavored tobacco
 product or tobacco product flavor enhancer seized or delivered to the department by a law enforcement agency regardless of the authority used by the law enforcement agency to seize the flavored tobacco product or tobacco product flavor enhancer. The department shall issue the civil penalty in accordance with the procedures applicable to the civil penalty authorized under Section 22974.7.

(2) In the case of a second seizure and forfeiture of flavored tobacco products or tobacco product flavor enhancers under subdivision (a), the department shall suspend the license of the retailer, in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 22980.3.
